Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-605
Property; condemnation for streets; damages; how paid.

Payment of damages assessed for the appropriation of private property for streets, alleys or boulevards in cities of the first class may be made out of the general or any other surplus fund.

Laws 1903, c. 19, § 7, p. 239;

R.S.1913, § 4906;

C.S.1922, § 4074;

Laws 1923, c. 145, § 1, p. 358;

C.S.1929, § 16-603;

R.S.1943, § 16-605.

Appropriation of lands for streets outside of city and the payment therefor is authorized. Webber v. City of Scottsbluff, 138 Neb. 416, 293 N.W. 276 (1940).